bulgarian.affix
flag *Z:
    А        >      -А,АТ
    А        >      -А,Е
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИЯ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИЯТ
    А        >      -А,ЕМ
    А        >      -А,ЕНИ
    А        >      -А,ЕНИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕШ
    А        >      -А,ЕШЕ
    А        >      -А,И
    А        >      -А,Я
    А        >      -А,ЯЛ
    А        >      -А,ЯЛА
    А        >      -А,ЯЛАТА
    А        >      -А,ЯЛО
    А        >      -А,ЯЛОТО
    А        >      -А,ЯН
    А        >      -А,ЯНА
    А        >      -А,ЯНАТА
    А        >      -А,ЯНИЯ
    А        >      -А,ЯНИЯТ
    А        >      -А,ЯНО
    А        >      -А,ЯНОТО
    А        >      -А,ЯХ
    А        >      -А,ЯХА
    А        >      -А,ЯХМЕ
    А        >      -А,ЯХТЕ
    М        >      -М,ДАТ
    М        >      -М,ДЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЙКИ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЛИ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЛИТЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЕМ
    М        >      -М,ДЕН
    М        >      -М,ДЕНА
    М        >      -М,ДЕНАТА
    М        >      -М,ДЕНИ
    М        >      -М,ДЕНИТЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЕНИЯ
    М        >      -М,ДЕНИЯТ
    М        >      -М,ДЕНО
    М        >      -М,ДЕНОТО
    М        >      -М,ДЕТЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЕШ
    М        >      -М,ДЕШЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЩ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЩА
    М        >      -М,ДЕЩАТА
    М        >      -М,ДЕЩИ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЩИТЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЩИЯ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЩИЯТ
    М        >      -М,ДЕЩО
    М        >      -М,ДЕЩОТО
    М        >      -М,ДОХ
    М        >      -М,ДОХА
    М        >      -М,ДОХМЕ
    М        >      -М,ДОХТЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛ
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛА
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛАТА
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛИЯ
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛИЯТ
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛО
    М        >      -М,ДЯЛОТО
    М        >      -М,ДЯХ
    М        >      -М,ДЯХА
    М        >      -М,ДЯХМЕ
    М        >      -М,ДЯХТЕ
    М        >      -М,Ж
    М        >      -М,ЖТЕ
    М        >      -М,Л
    М        >      -М,ЛА
    М        >      -М,ЛАТА
    М        >      -М,ЛИ
    М        >      -М,ЛИТЕ
    М        >      -М,ЛИЯ
    М        >      -М,ЛИЯТ
    М        >      -М,ЛО
    М        >      -М,ЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,Е
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЙКИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕМ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩОТО
    Я        >      -Я,Й
    Я        >      -Я,ЙТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХТЕ
